Wisconsin, session 2025, AB358.
do enact as follows:AB358,11Section 1. 157.70 (1) (cg) of the statutes is created to read:AB358,2,22157.70 (1) (cg) “Cemetery” has the meaning given in s. 157.061 (1p).AB358,23Section 2. 157.70 (2r) of the statutes is amended to read:AB358,2,104157.70 (2r) Site disturbance prohibited. Except as provided under subs. 5(4) and (5) and ss. 157.111 and 157.112, no person may intentionally cause or 6permit the disturbance of a burial site or cataloged land contiguous to a cataloged 7burial site. This subsection does not prohibit normal agricultural or practices, 8normal silvicultural practices which, or lawful maintenance if the practices or 9maintenance do not disturb the human remains in a burial site or the surface 10characteristics of a burial site.AB358,311Section 3. 157.70 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB358,3,212157.70 (3) (c) 1. Any person who knows or has reasonable grounds to believe 13that a burial site within a cemetery or the catalogued land contiguous to a 14catalogued burial site within a cemetery is disturbed or may be disturbed in 1violation of sub. (2r) shall report the disturbance or potential disturbance as soon as 2reasonably possible to the local police department or county sheriff’s office.AB358,3,532. Each sheriff and police department in the state shall prepare a report for 4each disturbance or potential disturbance reported under subd. 1. and shall send a 5copy of the report to the board and to the cemetery board.AB358,46Section 4. 440.03 (18) of the statutes is created to read:AB358,3,117440.03 (18) The department shall prescribe a form to be used by local police 8departments and county sheriff’s offices to report disturbances or potential 9disturbances to the burial sites preservation board and the cemetery board under s. 10157.70 (3) (c). The form shall include spaces to list the property address and the 11municipality in which the disturbance or potential disturbance occurred.AB358,512Section 5. 440.905 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB358,3,1613440.905 (3) (a) The board shall receive reports from sheriff’s offices and police 14departments prepared under s. 157.70 (3) (c) 2. At the first board meeting each 15calendar year, the board shall review all reports received from the previous 16calendar year and shall publish each report on the board’s website.AB358,3,2017(b) Annually, no later than March 1, the board shall submit a report to the 18department listing each report received under this subsection during the previous 19calendar year and the address, municipality, and county in which the disturbance 20or potential disturbance described in each report allegedly occurred.AB358,3,2121